apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__súci">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eho</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eho</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eho</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emu</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emu</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emu</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>eho</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plurals -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abstraktn/ý__adj">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__abstraktný"/>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dlh/ý__adj">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__abstraktný"/>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="absolútn/y__adj">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__absolútny"/>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cudz/í__adj">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__cudzí"/>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="absolútny"><i>absolútn</i><par n="absolútn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="čierny"><i>čiern</i><par n="absolútn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="európsky"><i>európsk</i><par n="absolútn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spektrálny"><i>spektráln</i><par n="absolútn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rôzny"><i>rôzn</i><par n="absolútn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="abstraktný"><i>abstraktn</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="potrebný"><i>potrebn</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="národný"><i>národn</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="medzinárodný"><i>medzinárodn</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pekný"><i>pekn</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="červený"><i>červen</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dlhý"><i>dlh</i><par n="dlh/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drahý"><i>drah</i><par n="dlh/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dnešný"><i>dnešn</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrý"><i>dobr</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ťažký"><i>ťažk</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ľahký"><i>ľahk</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="malý"><i>mal</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nový"><i>nov</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mnohý"><i>mnoh</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="voľný"><i>voľn</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vodný"><i>vodn</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="veľký"><i>veľk</i><par n="dlh/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vysoký"><i>vysok</i><par n="dlh/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svetový"><i>svetov</i><par n="abstraktn/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cudzí"><i>cudz</i><par n="cudz/í__adj"/></e>
